Hawaii, session 2026, SB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to establish a state-owned historic properties preservation plan working group to: (1)  Identify all state-owned historic properties and inherited lands; (2)  Develop a state-owned historic properties preservation plan; (3)  Identify a permanent funding source to ensure sustainable preservation efforts; and (4)  Develop frameworks for public-private partnerships that involve lineal descendants, cultural practitioners, and nonprofit organizations. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of land and natural resources a state-owned historic properties preservation plan working group. (b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)  The administrator of the state historic preservation division, who shall serve as chair; (2)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources or the chairperson's designee; (3)  The chief executive officer of the office of Hawaiian affairs or the chief executive officer's designee; (4)  The director of the planning department of each county or their designees; (5)  A cultural practitioner from each county to be nominated by the office of Hawaiian affairs; and (6)  Any other individuals that the chair may choose to invite. (c) The working group shall: (1)  Conduct a comprehensive inventory of state-owned historic properties; (2)  Evaluate the condition and significance of each state-owned historic property; (3)  Create actionable preservation and rehabilitation plans, prioritizing properties at risk; (4)  Develop criteria for the allocation of funds; (5)  Explore and propose permanent funding mechanisms, including new taxes, appropriations by the legislature, grants and donations from public-private partnerships, and revenue from adaptive reuse projects; (6)  Establish partnerships with lineal descendants, cultural practitioners, and nonprofit organizations; and (7)  Promote community engagement and stewardship programs. (d) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e) No member of the working group shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of the member's participation in the task force. (f)  The working group shall convene monthly and shall submit an interim report to the legislature every six months; provided that the working group shall also submit a conclusive report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature prior to the dissolution of the working group, detailing completed inventories and assessments and proposed preservation and funding plans. (g) The working group shall dissolve eighteen months after its establishment. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________